nl: Materiaal contactoppervlak: Kaal metaal (geen vulling); Kurk; Vilt; Schuim; Leer; Plastic; Rubber; Siliconen; Overig
hu: Érintkezési felület anyaga: Csupasz fém (párnázás nélkül); Parafa; Filc; Hab; Bőr; Műanyag; Gumi; Szilikon; Egyéb
pl: Materiał powierzchni stykowej: Surowy metal (brak wypełnienia); Korek; Filc; Pianka; Skóra; Tworzywo sztuczne; Guma; Silikon; Inny
pt-BR: Material da superfície de contato: Metal exposto (sem acolchoamento); Cortiça; Feltro; Espuma; Couro; Plástico; Borracha; Silicone; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál kontaktnej plochy: Holý kov (bez výplne); Korok; Plsť; Pena; Koža; Plast; Guma; Silikón; Iné
hr-HR: Materijal kontaktne površine: Goli metal (bez podstave); Pluto; Filc; Pjena; Koža; Plastika; Guma; Silikon; Ostalo
pt-PT: Material da superfície de contacto: Metal nu (sem acolchoamento); Cortiça; Feltro; Espuma; Couro; Plástico; Borracha; Silicone; Outro
vi: Chất liệu bề mặt tiếp xúc: Kim loại trần (không đệm); Gỗ bần; Nỉ; Mút xốp; Da; Nhựa; Cao su; Silicone; Khác
zh-TW: 接觸表面材質: 裸金屬 (無襯墊); 軟木; 毛氈; 泡棉; 皮革; 塑膠; 橡膠; 矽膠; 其他
lt-LT: Kontaktinio paviršiaus medžiaga: Neapdorotas metalas (be paminkštinimo); Kamštiena; Veltinis; Putos; Oda; Plastikas; Guma; Silikonas; Kita
zh-CN: 接触面材质: 裸金属（无衬垫）; 软木; 毡; 泡沫; 皮革; 塑料; 橡胶; 硅胶; 其他
sl-SI: Material stične površine: Gola kovina (brez oblazinjenja); Pluta; Polst; Pena; Usnje; Plastika; Guma; Silikon; Drugo
fi: Kosketuskohtien pintamateriaali: Paljas metalli (ei pehmustetta); Korkki; Huopa; Vaahtomuovi; Nahka; Muovi; Kumi; Silikoni; Muu
es: Material de la superficie de contacto: Metal expuesto (sin acolchado); Corcho; Fieltro; Espuma; Cuero; Plástico; Caucho; Silicona; Otro
ko: 접촉면 소재: 베어 메탈(패딩 없음); 코르크; 펠트; 폼; 가죽; 플라스틱; 고무; 실리콘; 기타
de: Material der Kontaktfläche: Blankes Metall (keine Polsterung); Kork; Filz; Schaumstoff; Leder; Kunststoff; Gummi; Silikon; Sonstige
cs: Materiál styčné plochy: Holý kov (bez polstrování); Korek; Plsť; Pěna; Kůže; Plast; Guma; Silikon; Jiné
ru: Материал контактной поверхности: Чистый металл (без покрытия); Пробка; Фетр; Пеноматериал; Кожа; Пластик; Резина; Силикон; Другое
nb: Materiale på kontaktoverflate: Bart metall (ingen polstring); Kork; Filt; Skum; Lær; Plast; Gummi; Silikon; Annet
it: Materiale della superficie di contatto: Metallo nudo (senza imbottitura); Sughero; Feltro; Schiuma; Pelle; Plastica; Gomma; Silicone; Altro
en: Contact surface material: Bare metal (no padding); Cork; Felt; Foam; Leather; Plastic; Rubber; Silicone; Other
fr: Matériau de la surface de contact: Métal nu (sans rembourrage); Liège; Feutre; Mousse; Cuir; Plastique; Caoutchouc; Silicone; Autre
ja: コンタクト表面素材: むき出しの金属 (パッドなし); コルク; フェルト; フォーム; レザー; プラスチック; ラバー; シリコン; その他
el: Υλικό επιφάνειας επαφής: Γυμνό μέταλλο (χωρίς επένδυση); Φελλός; Τσόχα; Αφρώδες υλικό; Δέρμα; Πλαστικό; Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Άλλο
bg-BG: Материал на контактната повърхност: Гол метал (без подплата); Корк; Филц; Пяна; Кожа; Пластмаса; Гума; Силикон; Друг
tr: Temas yüzeyi malzemesi: Çıplak metal (dolgusuz); Mantar; Keçe; Köpük; Deri; Plastik; Kauçuk; Silikon; Diğer
da: Kontaktoverflademateriale: Bart metal (ingen polstring); Kork; Filt; Skum; Læder; Plast; Gummi; Silikone; Andet
sv: Kontaktytans material: Ren metall (ingen vaddering); Kork; Filt; Skum; Läder; Plast; Gummi; Silikon; Annat
ro-RO: Materialul suprafeței de contact: Metal gol (fără căptușeală); Plută; Pâslă; Spumă; Piele; Plastic; Cauciuc; Silicon; Altele
th: วัสดุพื้นผิวจุดสัมผัส: โลหะเปลือย (ไม่มีวัสดุบุกันกระแทก); ไม้ก๊อก; สักหลาด; โฟม; หนัง; พลาสติก; ยาง; ซิลิโคน; อื่นๆ